test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-kogwr36_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - "kogõr, kokr": # Noun (36) "kogõr, kokr" 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kogõr+N+Sg+Nom: [kogõr, kokr]
     kogõr+N+Sg+Gen: kogrõ
     kogõr+N+Sg+Par: kokrõ
     kogõr+N+Sg+Ill: kokrõ
     kogõr+N+Sg+Ine: [kogrõn, kogrõh, kogrõhn]
     kogõr+N+Sg+Ela: kogrõst
     kogõr+N+Sg+All: kogrõlõ
     kogõr+N+Sg+Ade: kogrõl
     kogõr+N+Sg+Abl: kogrõlt
     kogõr+N+Sg+Tra: kogrõs
     kogõr+N+Sg+Ter: kogrõniq
     kogõr+N+Sg+Abe: kogrõldaq
     kogõr+N+Sg+Com: kogrõgaq
     kogõr+N+Pl+Nom: kogrõq
     kogõr+N+Pl+Gen: kokri
     kogõr+N+Pl+Par: kokri
     kogõr+N+Pl+Ill: [kokrihe, kokri, kokridõ]
     kogõr+N+Pl+Ine: [kogrin, kogrih, kogrihn]
     kogõr+N+Pl+Ela: kogrist
     kogõr+N+Pl+All: kogrilõ
     kogõr+N+Pl+Ade: kogril
     kogõr+N+Pl+Abl: kogrilt
     kogõr+N+Pl+Tra: kogris
     kogõr+N+Pl+Ter: kogriniq
     kogõr+N+Pl+Abe: kogrildaq
     kogõr+N+Pl+Com: kokrigaq
